California statutes. Education Code
(f) Notwithstanding this article, community colleges remain responsible for implementing state and federal laws pertaining to funding and providing services to students with disabilities, including, but not limited to, Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 67300) of Part 40 of Division 5, the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.), as amended, and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 48.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78213.

(a) A community college district or community college shall not use any assessment instrument for the purposes of this article without the authorization of the board of governors. The board of governors may adopt a list of authorized assessment instruments.

(b) The board of governors shall review all assessment instruments and shall consider for approval those that meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Assessment instruments shall meet established standards of validity and reliability.

(2) Assessment instruments shall be sensitive to cultural and language differences between students, and
 shall be adapted as necessary to accommodate students with disabilities.

(3) Assessment instruments shall be used solely as an advisory tool to assist students in the selection of appropriate courses.

(4) Assessment instruments shall not be used to exclude students from admission to community colleges.

(c) (1) A community college district or community college shall maximize the probability that a student will enter and complete transfer-level coursework in English and mathematics within a one-year timeframe of their initial attempt in the discipline. For a student with a declared academic goal, the transfer-level coursework shall satisfy the English and mathematics course requirements of the intended certificate or associate degree, or a requirement for transfer within the intended major, within
 a one-year timeframe of their initial attempt in the discipline.

(2) Community colleges shall use, in the placement and enrollment of students into English and mathematics courses in order to achieve this goal, one or more of the following measures:

(A) High school coursework.

(B) High school grades.

(C) High school grade point average.

(3) When using multiple measures, colleges shall apply multiple measures in the placement and enrollment of all students in such a manner that all of the following occur:

(A) Low performance on one measure shall be offset by a higher performance on another measure.

(B) Multiple measures shall be used to increase a student’s placement recommendation and shall not be used to lower it.

(C) Any one measure may demonstrate a student’s preparedness for transfer-level coursework.

(D) The multiple measures placement shall not require students to repeat coursework that they successfully completed in high school or college or for which they demonstrated competency through other methods of credit for prior learning.

(E) The multiple measures placement gives students access to a transfer-level course that will satisfy a requirement for the intended certificate or associate degree, or a requirement for transfer within the intended major.

(4) For the purposes of this
 subdivision, using high school grade point average as a composite of student performance over multiple years of high school coursework is a sufficient use of multiple evidence-based measures.

(5) Community colleges shall use multiple evidence-based measures for placing students into English-as-a-second-language (ESL) coursework. For those students placed into credit ESL coursework, their placement should maximize the probability that they will complete degree and transfer requirements in English within three years.

 (6) High school transcript data shall be used as the primary means for determining placement in English and mathematics courses. When high school transcript data is difficult to obtain, logistically problematic to use, or not available, a community college district or community college shall use self-reported high school information.

(7) (A) For students who have not graduated from high school, or for high school graduates unable to provide self-reported high school information, community colleges may use guided placement or self-placement.

(B) The placement and enrollment resulting from the guided or self-placement method shall maximize the probability that students enter and complete transfer-level mathematics and English coursework that satisfies a requirement of the intended certificate or associate degree or a requirement for transfer within the intended major, within a one-year timeframe of their initial attempt in the discipline.

(C) A community college may use guided placement or self-placement to direct English language learners who are not United States high school graduates into credit ESL programs and shall maximize
 the probability that students in credit ESL programs enter and complete transfer-level English within a timeframe of three years.

(D) District placement methods based upon guided placement, including self-placement, shall not do either of the following:

(i) Incorporate sample problems, assignments, assessment instruments, or tests, including those designed for skill assessment.

(ii) Request students to solve problems, answer curricular questions, present demonstrations and examples of coursework designed to show knowledge or mastery of prerequisite skills, or demonstrate skills through tests or surveys.

(8) The board of governors shall establish regulations governing the use of these and other measures, instruments, and placement models to ensure that
 the measures, instruments, and placement models selected by a community college demonstrate that they guide English and mathematics placements and enrollment to achieve the goal of maximizing the probability that a student will enter and complete transfer-level coursework in English and mathematics that satisfies a requirement of the intended certificate or associate degree or a requirement for transfer within the intended major within a one-year timeframe and credit ESL students will complete transfer-level coursework in English within a timeframe of three years.

(9) A community college district or community college shall maximize the probability that a student will enter and complete college-level coursework in English and mathematics within a one-year timeframe that for students who seek a goal other than transfer, and who are in certificate or degree programs with specific mathematics and English requirements, as determined by the program’s
 advisory board or accrediting body, that cannot be met with transfer-level coursework.

(10) Programs without mathematics or English requirements are exempt from this subdivision.

(d) A community college district or community college shall not recommend or require students to enroll in pretransfer-level English or mathematics coursework unless both of the following are true:

(1) The student is highly unlikely to succeed in a transfer-level English or mathematics course based on their high school grade point average and coursework.

(2) The enrollment in pretransfer-level coursework will improve the student’s probability of completing transfer-level coursework in English and mathematics within a one-year timeframe or, for credit ESL students, completing
 transfer-level coursework in English within a three-year timeframe.

(e) (1) By July 1, 2023, if a community college places and enrolls students into transfer-level mathematics or English coursework that does not satisfy a requirement for the student’s intended certificate or associate degree, or a requirement for transfer within the intended major, the community college shall show both of the following to verify the benefit of the coursework to students:

(A) The student is highly unlikely to succeed in a transfer-level English or mathematics course that satisfies a requirement for the intended certificate or associate degree, or a requirement for transfer within the intended major.

(B) The enrollment will improve the student’s probability of completing transfer-level mathematics or English
 coursework that satisfies a requirement for the intended certificate or associate degree, or a requirement for transfer within the intended major, within a one-year timeframe.

(2) If the benefit of the coursework, as described in paragraph (1), is not verified, the college shall not recommend or require students to enroll in that course after July 1, 2024, and shall notify students who continue to enroll in the course that it is optional and does not improve their chances of completing subsequent coursework that satisfies a requirement for their intended certificate or associate degree, or a requirement for transfer within their intended major.

(f) (1) By July 1, 2024, for calculus-based associate degrees or transfer majors in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM), community colleges shall examine the impact of placing and enrolling
 students into transfer-level course sequences, composed of no more than two transfer-level courses, that prepare students for the first STEM calculus course, in order to verify the benefit of the coursework to students by showing all of the following:

(A) The student is highly unlikely to succeed in the first STEM calculus course without the additional transfer-level preparation.

(B) The enrollment will improve the student’s probability of completing the first STEM calculus course.

(C) The enrollment will improve the student’s persistence to and completion of the second calculus course in the STEM program, if a second calculus course is required.

(2) If the benefit of the coursework, as described in paragraph (1), is not verified, the college shall not
 recommend or require students to enroll in that course after July 1, 2025, and shall notify students who continue to enroll in the course that it is optional and does not improve their chances of completing calculus for their STEM program.

(g) Community colleges are encouraged to explore the impact of concurrent support for the first STEM calculus course as an alternative to transfer-level preparatory courses that are not part of the STEM degree or transfer coursework for the STEM major.

(h) By July 1, 2023, a community college district or community college, when considering the placement and enrollment of a student into transfer-level English and mathematics, shall not rely upon any of the following as a justification for placing and enrolling a student into pretransfer-level mathematics or English coursework or into transfer-level mathematics or English coursework that does not
 satisfy a requirement for the student’s intended certificate or associate degree, or a requirement for transfer within the intended major:

(1) The length of time between a student’s enrollment date at the community college and the student’s high school graduation date.

(2) Whether the student belongs to a special population, including, but not limited to, foster youth, veterans, economically disadvantaged students or those students who participate in extended opportunity programs and services, participants in disability services and programs for students, and students in Umoja, Puente, or Mathematics, Engineering, Science Achievement (MESA) programs.

(3) Whether the student can provide a high school transcript, self-reports high school information, or uses self-placement or guided placement.

(i) (1) By July 1, 2023, all United States high school graduates, and those who have received a high school equivalency certificate, regardless of background or special population status, who plan to pursue a certificate, degree, or transfer program offered by the California Community Colleges, shall be directly placed into, and, when beginning coursework in English or mathematics, enrolled in, transfer-level English and mathematics courses.

(2) If the student has a declared academic goal, the mathematics and English coursework shall satisfy a requirement of the student’s intended certificate or associate degree or a requirement for transfer within the intended major.

(3) A community college shall not require students to repeat coursework that they have successfully completed in high school or
 college or take coursework that repeats competencies that the student has demonstrated through other methods of credit for prior learning.

(4) A community college shall not enroll into noncredit coursework students who have graduated from a United States high school or been issued a high school equivalency certificate, as a substitute or replacement for direct placement and enrollment into transfer-level English and mathematics coursework as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(j) The following are exceptions to transfer-level placement and enrollment into mathematics and English coursework, as described in subdivision (i):

(1) Students who have not graduated from a United States high school or been issued a high school equivalency certificate.

(2) Students enrolled in a certificate program without English or mathematics requirements.

(3) Students enrolled in a noncredit ESL course who have not graduated from a United States high school or been issued a high school equivalency certificate.

(4) Students with documented disabilities in educational assistance classes, as described in Section 56028 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, who are otherwise not able to benefit from general college classes even with appropriate academic adjustments, auxiliary aids, and services.

(5) Students enrolled in adult education programs who have not graduated from a United States high school or been issued a high school equivalency certificate.

(6) Students enrolled in adult education
 programs who are enrolled in coursework other than mathematics or English.

(7) Current high school students in dual enrollment or taking courses not available in their local high school.

(8) The community college has provided local research and data pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f) to verify the benefit of the placement and enrollment into transfer-level coursework that does not satisfy a requirement for the intended certificate or associate degree or a requirement for transfer within the intended major.

(9) College-level placement and enrollment in lieu of transfer-level placement and enrollment may occur for:

(A) Students in career technical programs seeking a certificate or associate degree with specific requirements, as dictated by the program’s
 advisory or accrediting body, that cannot be satisfied with transfer-level coursework

(B) Specific subgroups of students for whom a community college district or community college has provided local research and data meeting the evidence standards pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f) that allow for the placement and enrollment of the student subgroup into pretransfer-level mathematics or English coursework.

(k) (1) For students who need or desire extra academic support when enrolled in transfer-level mathematics or English coursework, community colleges shall provide access to tutoring, support-enhanced transfer-level mathematics and English courses, concurrent low-unit credit or similar contact hour noncredit corequisite coursework for transfer-level mathematics and English, or other academic supports.

(2) A community college may require students to enroll in additional concurrent support, including additional language support for ESL students, during the same term that they take a transfer-level English or mathematics course, if it is determined that the support will increase the student’s likelihood of passing the transfer-level English or mathematics course.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as limiting student access to additional concurrent support nor requiring students to enroll into concurrent supports.

(l) The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges may require a community college or community college district to change or adopt a placement policy or practice identified by the chancellor’s office to ensure that a community college or community college district’s placement and enrollment of students into mathematics,
 English, and ESL is consistent with the requirements of this section.

(m) Nothing in this section is meant to add mathematics and English requirements to certificate programs that do not have mathematics or English requirements.

(n) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Assessment” means the process of gathering information about a student regarding the student’s study skills, English language proficiency, computational skills, aptitudes, goals, learning skills, career aspirations, academic performance, and need for special services. Assessment methods may include, but not necessarily be limited to, interviews, standardized tests, attitude surveys, vocational or career aptitude and interest inventories, high school or postsecondary transcripts, specialized certificates or licenses,
 educational histories, and other measures of performance.

(2) “Pretransfer level,” with respect to courses, includes basic skills, remedial, and college-level courses.

(3) “Transfer-level written communication” and “transfer-level quantitative reasoning” have the same meaning as transfer-level English and transfer-level mathematics, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 926, Sec. 3.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78213.1.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2023, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall make available on its internet website a dashboard containing multiyear data, beginning from 2015. The dashboard shall be updated annually pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall contain data submitted to the chancellor’s office by community colleges on student progression and completion of transfer-level English, mathematics, and ESL courses, disaggregated by community college and by all the following:

(1) Age group.

(2) Whether the student received corequisite support.

(3) Receipt of disability services and programs for
 students.

(4) Receipt of extended opportunity programs and services.

(5) Ethnicity.

(6) Foster youth status.

(7) Gender.

(8) Discipline–relevant high school performance bands.

(9) Mathematics, Engineering, Science Achievement (MESA) program students.

(10) Puente students.

(11) Umoja students.

(12) Veteran status.

(b) Beginning on December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall update the dashboard, as established in subdivision (a), and inform the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Assembly Budget Subcommittee on Education Finance, the Senate Committee on Education, and the Senate Budget and Fiscal Review Subcommittee on Education of the update.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 926, Sec. 4.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78213.2.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) “Community college” means a college of the California Community Colleges system or a community college district that maintains the college.

(3) “Concurrent supports” includes, but is not limited to, corequisite courses, support-enhanced transfer-level mathematics or English courses, supervised tutoring, embedded tutoring, coteaching courses, tutoring, or any other academic supports offered by a community college.

(4) “Equitable placement and completion policies and practices” means the placement and completion policies and practices described in Section 78213.

(5) “Program” means the California Community College Equitable Placement and Completion Grant Program established pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) The California Community College Equitable Placement and Completion Grant Program is hereby established under the administration of the chancellor’s office. Grants awarded to community colleges pursuant to this section are intended to ensure the implementation of equitable placement and completion policies and practices.

(2) The chancellor’s office shall distribute grants to community colleges that satisfy the requirements of this section, and
 any programmatic criteria and administrative guidelines developed by the chancellor’s office to implement the program.

(c) The chancellor’s office shall award grants to community colleges from the funds described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) as follows:

(1) Thirty-four percent of funds as a base allocation to all community colleges.

(2) Thirty-three percent of funds to community colleges with below average enrollment in transfer-level mathematics or English courses.

(3) Thirty-three percent of these funds shall be awarded to community colleges with below average success rates of students successfully completing transfer-level mathematics or English courses within one year of their first attempt in the discipline.

(d) Before the chancellor’s office may award a grant to a community college, the college shall demonstrate its commitment to implement equitable placement and completion policies and practices by submitting a detailed plan, on or before May 1, 2023, documenting changes in placement practices and curricular structures that the college will implement to reach the goal of full implementation of Sections 78212 and 78213.

(e) A community college may use the grant to implement equitable placement and completion policies and practices for limited-term purposes, including, but not limited to, any or any combination of the following:

(1) Faculty release time to design, implement, and evaluate corequisite transfer-level mathematics/quantitative reasoning and English courses at scale.

(2) Professional development for faculty, including subject pedagogy, classroom climate, and corequisite implementation, including evaluation and iterative improvement of the effectiveness of the professional development.

(3) Creation, implementation, and evaluation of concurrent supports or support services to increase throughput rates for transfer-level mathematics/quantitative reasoning and English courses.

(4) Faculty release time to redesign, implement, and evaluate certificate and associate degree pathways to ensure mathematics/quantitative reasoning and English courses associated with the pathways are transfer-level courses.

(5) Any other services suggested by community colleges and approved by the chancellor’s office for which there is evidence of
 their likelihood of improving the successful completion of transfer-level mathematics/quantitative reasoning and English courses by students within a one year timeframe of their initial attempt in the discipline.

(f) A community college that receives the grant shall use 10 percent of their grant for professional development in inclusive teaching practices and subject pedagogy. All faculty are encouraged to attend the professional development and it is the Legislature’s intent for community colleges to require faculty who teacher remedial mathematics/quantitative reasoning or English to attend the professional development courses offered pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) (1) The chancellor’s office shall report to the Director of Finance and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, as follows:

(A) On or before September 1, 2023, a summary of the plans received by the chancellor’s office pursuant to subdivision (d).

(B) On or before July 1, 2025, provide an updated summary of each community colleges’ progress in implementing its plan developed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(C) On or before July 1, 2027, provide an additional updated summary of each community colleges’ progress in implementing its plan developed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) Each report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) may include recommendations on any statutory or regulatory changes necessary to improve the ability of community colleges to implement their locally developed guided pathways programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 28.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78214.

(a) All participating districts shall, with the assistance of the chancellor, establish and maintain institutional research to evaluate the effectiveness of the Student Success and Support Program described by this article and of any other programs or services designed to facilitate students’ completion of their educational goals and courses of study.

(b) The metrics for this research shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Prior educational experience, including transcripts when appropriate, as determined by the chancellor.

(2) Educational goals and
 courses of study.

(3) Criteria for exemption from orientation, assessment, or required counseling or advisement, if applicable.

(4) Need for financial assistance.

(5) Disaggregated data by ethnicity, gender, disability, age, and socioeconomic status, to the extent this information is available.

(6) Academic performance, such as the completion of specified unit thresholds, success in basic skills courses, grade point average, course completion outcomes, transfer readiness, and degree and certificate completion.

(7) Any additional information that the chancellor finds appropriate.

(c) The evaluation provided for by this section
 shall include an assessment of the effectiveness of the programs and services in attaining at least the following objectives:

(1) Helping students to define their academic and career goals and declare a course of study.

(2) Assisting institutions in the assessment of students’ educational needs and valid course placement.

(3) Helping support students’ successful course completion and goal attainment.

(4) Matching institutional resources with students’ educational needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 9.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78215.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with students, faculty, student service administrators, and other key stakeholders, shall establish policies and processes for all of the following:

(1) Requiring all nonexempt students to complete orientation and assessment and to develop education plans.

(2) Exempting students from participation in orientation, assessment, or required education planning services under this article.

(3) Requiring community college districts to adopt a student appeal process.

(b) To ensure that students are not unfairly impacted by the requirements of this chapter, these policies and processes shall be phased in over a reasonable period of time as determined by the board of governors in consideration of the resources available to provide the core services identified in Section 78212.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that these policies and processes be developed and implemented only as resources are provided and utilized by community college campuses to provide the student support services, individual counseling and advising, and technology-based strategies necessary to ensure that students can successfully meet the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 10.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78216.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that community college districts are currently funding various components of student matriculation through existing orientation, counseling and advising, education planning, assessment, and other student services, but that adequate student matriculation and implementation of the Student Success and Support Program strategies cannot be realized without supplemental funding support.

(b) The board of governors shall develop a formula for allocating the funding for the Student Success and Support Program to implement the services identified in Section 78212 at community colleges. The formula shall include the requirement that the districts or colleges
 contribute matching funds in an amount to be established by the board of governors in each case, and shall reflect, but not be necessarily limited to, other considerations as follows:

(1) The number of students to receive services at each college.

(2) The number of students who received orientation, assessment, counseling and advising, and other education planning services.

(3) The requirement that funds for the Student Success and Support Program services be expended only for services approved by the board of governors.

(4) The requirement that any district or college receiving funding pursuant to this section agree to implement this article, implement the board of governors’ system of common assessment, if using an assessment instrument for placement,
 and implement the board of governors’ accountability scorecard, pursuant to Section 84754.5, when established during the period in which it receives that funding.

 (5) Insofar as a community college district is able to fully implement in-person or technology strategies for orientation, assessment, and education planning services, the board of governors may identify other noninstructional support services that can be funded through this article.

(c) The board of governors shall require participating colleges to develop a Student Success and Support Program plan that reflects all of the following:

(1) A description of the Student Success and Support Program services identified in Section 78212 to be provided.

(2) A description of the college’s process to
 identify students at risk for academic or progress probation and the college’s plan for interventions or services to students.

(3) The college budget for the state-funded Student Success and Support Program services pursuant to Sections 78212 and 78214.

(4) The development and training of staff and faculty to implement the Student Success and Support Program services.

(5) In multicampus districts, the coordination of the college Student Success and Support Program plan with other college plans within the district.

(6) Technology services and institutional research and evaluation necessary for implementation of this article.

(7) Coordination with college student equity plans to ensure that
 the college has identified strategies to monitor and address equity issues and mitigate any disproportionate impacts on student access and achievement.

(8) The extent to which the community college is able to develop partnerships with feeder high school districts, workforce agencies, and other community partners to assist entering students in career and educational exploration and planning and leverage resources to support a successful transition to college and career.

(d) The board of governors may allocate up to 5 percent of the total funds appropriated for the Student Success and Support Program for state administrative operations to carry out the intent of this article, subject to the review of the annual budget process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 11.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78218.

In the 2012–13 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, this article shall be operative only if funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 12.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: Operational conditions apply to Article 1, commencing with Section 78210.)
-------------------------------------------

78219.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall establish a common assessment system to be used as one of multiple measures, consistent with existing regulations, for the purposes of community college placement and advisement. The system shall include all of the following objectives:

(1) Selection of an existing commercially available and centrally delivered system of student assessment that provides a single common assessment instrument for use by community colleges in the curriculum areas of English, mathematics, and English as a second language.

(2) Creation of a secure, centrally housed assessment test data
 warehouse that shall collect all of the following:

(A) All available assessment scores generated by assessed students at all community colleges.

(B) All available K–12 assessment data for students at all community colleges. The use of this data shall be limited to placing and advising community college students to enhance their success with and completion of their postsecondary education objectives.

(C) Other data or student transcript information that is used for the purpose of student placement.

(3) Creation of an Internet Web portal that can be accessed by community college personnel and students and that provides all of the following:

(A) An assessment profile, generated for each
 student upon request, that includes all assessment information available in the data warehouse created pursuant to paragraph (2). This profile shall be accessible for counseling, matriculation, and course placement purposes.

(B) A pretest application that emulates the structure of the student assessment created pursuant to paragraph (1) that students can practice on and familiarize themselves with before taking future assessments.

(C) An advisement tool that provides students with information about the importance of taking the common assessment to be placed in college-level courses in English, mathematics, or English as a second language and the historical success rates of students who place in various levels of remedial coursework.

(b) In developing the common assessment, the Office of the Chancellor of the
 California Community Colleges shall work in collaboration with the State Department of Education and the California State University when developing a common college-readiness standard that will be reflected in the creation of assessment instruments.

(c) The Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Legislature and the Governor on the progress of the implementation of the common assessment system by December 31, 2012.

(d) The provisions of this section shall be operative upon the receipt of state, federal, or philanthropic funds sufficient to cover the costs of the common assessment system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 743)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section conditionally operative, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Student Equity Plans [78220. - 78222.]

78220.

(a) As a condition for receiving Student Success and Support Program funding, and in order to ensure equal educational opportunities and to promote student success for all students, regardless of race, gender, age, disability, or economic circumstances, the governing board of each community college district shall maintain a student equity plan that includes all of the following for each community college in the community college district:

(1) Campus-based research, as to the extent of student equity by gender and for each of the following categories of students, that uses the methodology established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 78221:

(A) Current or former foster youth.

(B) Students with disabilities.

(C) Low-income students.

(D) Veterans.

(E) Students in the following ethnic and racial categories, as they are defined by the United States Census Bureau for the 2010 Census for reporting purposes:

(i) American Indian or Alaska Native.

(ii) Asian.

(iii) Black or African American.

(iv) Hispanic or Latino.

(v) Native Hawaiian or other Pacific Islander.

(vi) White.

(vii) Some other race.

(viii) More than one race.

(F) Homeless students.

(G) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender students.

(H) Additional categories of students determined by the governing board of the community college district.

(2) To the extent that student data described in paragraph (1) has been collected, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall make the data
 available to community college districts for determining student equity and disproportionate impact.

(3) Goals for access and retention, degree and certificate completion, English as a Second Language and foundational skills, completion, and transfer for the overall student population and for each population group of high-need or disadvantaged students, and a determination of what activities are most likely to effectively meet those goals.

(4) Whether significant underrepresentation is found to exist pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3), based on the methodology established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 78221, measures for addressing the disparities in those areas, implementation activities designed to attain the goals specified in paragraph (3), including, but not limited to,
 the adoption of evidence-based models of remediation, implementation of placement and enrollment policies that more accurately predict student success and identify students’ pretransfer needs, and a means of coordinating with, at a minimum, the following student equity-related categorical programs or campus-based programs:

(A) Students with disabilities.

(B) Extended Opportunity Programs and Services and Special Services.

(C) Fund for Student Success.

(D) Student Success and Support Program.

(E) Programs for foster youth.

(F) Programs for veterans.

(G) Special
 Services for CalWORKs Recipients.

(H) Student Financial Aid Administration.

(I) Student Success for Basic Skills Students.

(5) Sources of funds for the activities in the plan.

(6) A schedule and process for evaluation.

(7) An executive summary that includes, at a minimum, the student groups for whom goals have been set, the goals, the initiatives that the community college or community college district will undertake to achieve these goals, the resources that have been budgeted for that purpose, and the community college district official to contact for further information. Commencing with the 2016–17 academic year, the executive summary shall also include a detailed accounting of how
 funding was expended and an assessment of the progress made in achieving the identified goals.

(8) A description of the active involvement of all groups on campus, including, but not limited to, those identified in subdivision (b), in developing the student equity plan.

(b) Student equity plans shall be developed with the active involvement of all groups on campus as required by law, including, but not limited to, the academic senate, academic faculty and staff, student services, and students, and with the involvement of appropriate people from the community.

(c) The plan shall be adopted by the governing board of the community college district and submitted to the Chancellor of the California Community